Utah statutes.
58-31b-103.   Nurse Education and Enforcement Account.
(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as
the "Nurse Education and Enforcement Account."
(2)  The restricted account shall be nonlapsing and consist of:
(a)  administrative penalties imposed under Section 58-31b-503; and
(b)  interest earned on money in the account.
(3) Money in the account may be appropriated by the Legislature for the
following purposes:
(a)  education and training of licensees or potential licensees under this
chapter;
(b)  enforcement of this chapter by:
(i)  investigating unprofessional or unlawful conduct;
(ii)  providing legal representation to the division when legal action is
taken against a person engaging in unprofessional or unlawful conduct; and
(iii)  monitoring compliance of renewal requirements;
(c)  survey nursing education programs throughout the state;
(d)  education and training of board members; and
(e)  review and approve nursing education programs and medication aide
certified training programs.
